Massachusetts, session 194th, S2544.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10 of chapter 39 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the select board of the town of Andover shall call a
special town meeting upon the written request of 200 registered voters or 5 per cent of the total
number of registered voters of the town, whichever number is greater. Such meeting shall be
held not later than 90 days after the receipt of such petition and shall include in the warrant for
such meeting all of the subjects the inclusion of which is requested by said petition.
of 1